Hawaii statutes.
§706-606.6 Repeat violent and sexual
offender; enhanced sentence. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, any person who is convicted of an offense under section
707-701.5, 707-702, 707-730, 707-731, 707-732, 707-733.6, 707-750, 708-840, 712-1202,
712-1203, or 712-1209.1, after having been convicted on at least three prior
and separate occasions of an offense under section 707-701.5, 707-702, 707-710,
707-711, 707‑730, 707-731, 707-732, 707-733.6, 707-750, 708-840, 712-1202,
712-1203, or 712-1209.1, or of an offense under federal law or the laws of
another state that is comparable to an offense under section 707-701.5,
707-702, 707-710, 707-711, 707-730, 707-731, 707-732, 707-733.6, 707-750,
708-840, 712-1202, 712-1203, or 712-1209.1, shall be sentenced to an extended
term of imprisonment as provided in section 706-661.

(2) A conviction shall not be considered a
prior offense unless the conviction occurred within the following time periods:

(a) For an offense under section 707-701.5, 707-702,
707‑730, 707-733.6, 707-750, 708-840, 712-1202, 712-1203, or 712-1209.1, within
the past twenty years from the date of the instant offense;

(b) For an offense under section 707-710 or 707-731,
within the past ten years from the date of the instant offense;

(c) For an offense under section 707-711 or 707-732,
within the past five years from the date of the instant offense; or

(d) For an offense under federal law or the laws of
another state that is comparable to an offense under section 707-701.5,
707-702, 707-710, 707-711, 707-730, 707-731, 707-732, 707-733.6, 707-750,
708-840, 712-1202, 712-1203, or 712-1209.1, within the maximum term of
imprisonment possible under the appropriate jurisdiction. [L 1999, c 286, §1;
am L 2006, c 60, §4; am L 2014, c 114, §2]

COMMENTARY ON §706-606.6

Act 286, Session Laws 1999, added this section, mandating an
extended term of imprisonment for multiple offenses, to heighten penalties for
habitual violent and sexual offenders. The legislature found that repeat
violent and sexual offenders deserve some degree of enhanced sentencing.
Conference Committee Report No. 89.

Act 60, Session Laws 2006, amended this section by deleting
the references to §707-733.5, repealed by Act 60, and substituting references to
§707-733.6, added by Act 60. Act 60 reenacted provisions that define the
behavior that constitutes the crime of continuous sexual assault of a minor
under the age of fourteen years and the unanimity that is required to convict a
person of the crime. House Standing Committee Report No. 150-06.

Act 114, Session Laws 2014, amended this section to include
the offenses of promoting prostitution in the first and second degrees, and
solicitation of a minor for prostitution. Senate Standing Committee Report No.
3249, Conference Committee Report No. 41-14.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next